Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 1 General Provisions
§ 24-1-109.
Closing or restricting use; failure to observe signs and markers; exceptions.

Any person who willfully fails to observe any sign, marker, warning, notice, or direction, placed or given under W.S.

24-1-108

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof by any court of competent jurisdiction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or to imprisonment for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days, or to both such fine and imprisonment.

The department or state highway patrol may allow a person to proceed past any sign, marker, warning, notice or other device posted pursuant to W.S.

24-1-108

under the following circumstances:

The person requesting permission to travel upon a closed road is seeking to travel to a destination beyond the closure point, but in an area unaffected by the conditions warranting the closure;

The department or state highway patrol makes a determination there is no dangerous or hazardous condition which would reasonably preclude the ability of the person to travel on the closed portion of the highway; and

The person making the request shall agree to any conditions or requirements for traveling on the closed portion of the highway which are imposed by the department or state highway patrol.

Any permission granted under subsection (b) of this section to travel upon a closed road shall be granted by the department or the state highway patrol on a case-by-case basis, unless otherwise determined by the department or the highway patrol.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 44, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 24-10; 2009, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” in (a); and added (b) and (c).

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section,

see Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 24-1-110.
Speed or acceleration contest or exhibition on highways.

No person shall engage in any motor vehicle speed or acceleration contest, or exhibition of speed or acceleration on any highway without approval of such use by the governing body in charge of said highway. No person shall aid or abet in any such motor vehicle speed or acceleration contest or exhibition on any highway, without approval of such use by the governing body in charge of said highway.

No person shall for the purpose of facilitating or aiding or as an incident to any motor vehicle speed or acceleration contest upon a highway, in any manner obstruct or place or assist in placing any barricade or obstruction upon any highway without approval of such use by the governing body in charge of said highway.

Any person who violates this section shall upon conviction be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ten (10) days or both.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 8, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-10.2.

Cross references. —

As to regulating traffic on highways, see chapter 5 of title 31.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of public authority for injury arising out of automobile race conducted on street or highway, 80 ALR3d 1192.

§ 24-1-111.
County road districts.

All counties shall be divided into road districts. The board of county commissioners of each county shall divide their county into road districts of as compact form and convenient size as is practicable, and embracing the territory within an election district, if possible, and may change or alter said road district from time to time as the public convenience may require.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 32; R.S. 1899, § 1937; C.S. 1910, § 2547; Laws 1913, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3038; R.S. 1931, § 52-301; C.S. 1945, § 48-338; W.S. 1957, § 24-11.

Cross references. —

As to establishment, vacation or alteration of county highways, see chapter 3 of this title.

§ 24-1-112.
Construction and repair of fences to be performed by department of transportation.

Except as provided by W.S. 11-24-108(g) or subsection (c) of this section, in the event that fences paralleling state highways, or built on the highway right-of-way need repair or reconstruction to meet legal fence requirements, as set forth in W.S.

11-28-102

, the actual work of repair and reconstruction of the fence, including all corresponding labor costs, shall be performed by the department of transportation.

Where any state highway is reconstructed the new right-of-way fence will be constructed and maintained by the department of transportation.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a landowner or the owner or person having custody or charge of livestock may, but is not obligated to, attempt to repair any fence under this section in order to protect livestock or prevent livestock from entering a highway. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to create or increase any liability of a landowner or an owner or person having custody or charge of livestock.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-12; Laws 1967, ch. 212, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2013 ch. 76, § 1, effective February 27, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “11-28-102” for “11-33-102” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2013 amendment,

added “Except as provided by W.S. 11-24-108(g) or subsection (c) of this section,” in the beginning of (a); and added (c).

Laws 2013, ch. 76, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Section

11-33-102

, referred to in subsection (a), was redesignated as §

11-28-102

in 1978.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 24-1-113.
Owner of unnatural canal to construct and maintain bridge at road crossing; subsequent assumption and maintenance by county.

Any person, company, corporation or association of persons, operating or maintaining in whole or in part, either as owners, agent, occupant or appropriator any ditch, canal or watercourse, not being a natural stream, for irrigation or any other, and different purpose, shall put in, construct, maintain and keep in repair at his, her, its or their expense for one (1) year, where the same crosses any public highway or publicly traveled road, a good substantial bridge, not less than fourteen (14) feet in width, over such ditch, canal or watercourse where it crosses such road. Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, the person so offending shall pay a fine in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each day such ditch, canal or watercourse shall be unbridged, insufficiently bridged, or permitted to remain out of repair; provided, that after the expiration of one (1) year, from the construction of said bridge, the road supervisor of the road district in which said bridge is located, shall upon being notified by the owner or owners of the ditch, canal or watercourse over which said bridge is constructed, at once inspect said bridge, and if found in a good and lawful condition, shall accept the same for the county in which it is located, and said bridge shall thereafter be maintained by the said county.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 55; R.S. 1899, § 1959; Laws 1901, ch. 21, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2567; C.S. 1920, § 3058; R.S. 1931, § 52-306; C.S. 1945, § 48-339; W.S. 1957, § 24-13.

Cross references. —

For authority of board of directors of water conservancy district to construct works across public highways, see §

41-3-742

.

As to duty to build bridge when ditch crosses public roads, see §

41-5-104

.

As to removal or destruction of bridges or flumes, see §

41-5-107

.

§ 24-1-114.
Bridges between counties.

Whenever it shall appear to be advantageous to any county or counties to build or repair any bridge or bridges over streams constituting the boundary line of such county or counties, or when such bridge or bridges when built will be partly in one (1) county and partly in another county in this state, or when a bridge when built shall be partly in a county of this state and partly in a county of another state, it shall be lawful for the county commissioners of any county in which part of such bridge has been or is to be erected, to join with the other county or counties containing or to contain other parts of the said bridge, in making any contract or contracts for the purpose of procuring the erection or repair of such bridge or bridges on the basis that each of the counties contracting shall pay one-half of the whole expense of building or repairing such bridge or bridges.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 51, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3069; R.S. 1931, § 52-404; C.S. 1945, § 48-343; W.S. 1957, § 24-14.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for negligence of public body or political subdivision operating toll bridge, 43 ALR2d 550.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from design, construction, or failure to warn of narrow bridge, 2 ALR4th 635.

§ 24-1-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 71, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to contracts for county bridge work, see §

24-1-132

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 59, related to contracts for bridge work.

§ 24-1-116.
Restrictions upon damming streams; generally.

No person or persons, company or corporation, or association of persons, shall be permitted or allowed to dam the water or waters of any stream or irrigating or mining ditch or any waterway so that the water thus dammed, or any part thereof, shall overflow any public road or highway, or undermine, weaken or damage any bridge, or any walls or embankment of any road, nor shall any person, association or corporation owning or controlling any ditch or irrigated lands, allow any wastewater from the same to flow across or upon any public road or highway. Any person finding a public road or highway or any bridge flooded or damaged by such wastewater may report the same to the road supervisor of the county in which such road, highway or bridge may be located, who shall make an examination and report to the county attorney for the county. If the report of the said road supervisor shows that such damage has occurred, it shall then be the duty of the county attorney to institute proceedings against the party or parties whose negligence has caused such damage.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 61; R.S. 1899, § 1965; Laws 1905, ch. 63, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2575; C.S. 1920, § 3066; R.S. 1931, § 52-402; C.S. 1945, § 48-341; W.S. 1957, § 24-16; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Measure and elements of damages for injury to bridge, 31 ALR5th 171.

§ 24-1-117.
Restrictions upon damming streams; effect of failure to comply with W.S. 24-1-116.

Any person or persons, company or corporation, violating the provisions of W.S.

24-1-116

, shall be liable to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), and shall also be liable to the party injured for any damages resulting therefrom.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 62; R.S. 1899, § 1966; C.S. 1910, § 2576; C.S. 1920, § 3067; R.S. 1931, § 52-403; C.S. 1945, § 48-342; W.S. 1957, § 24-17.

Cross references. —

As to obstructing or injuring highways or bridges, see §

35-10-401

.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 66, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 24-1-118.
Construction and maintenance to be performed at expense of state; geologic formations.

Excepting as such work may be performed through mutual agreement with other entities, either public or private, the construction and maintenance of all state highways, including all bridges, and culverts thereon, shall be performed at the expense of the state and by and under the supervision of the commission and the director of the department of transportation or his authorized representative.

When a new permanent highway cut is made that exposes a bedrock geological formation:

It shall be the policy of the state to leave the bedrock geological formation exposed and not to cover it with soil and planted vegetation except when:

There are safety requirements that require another treatment;

The exposure occurs on private, tribal or federal land that will be private, tribal or federal land once the construction is completed and the landowner desires a different reclamation; or

There are cost of construction or operational reasons to remove or cover the exposed formation.

After completion of highway construction, for any exposed bedrock geological formation site within the highway right-of-way, with exceptions for site specific safety needs, an individual wishing to understand the local geology for economic, educational or private curiosity reasons may examine the cut and the exposed formation and may remove any geologic samples as may be gathered by hand or collected using geological hammers or other hand held tools;

The department of transportation shall work with the state geologist to address and resolve any grievances raised under this subsection;

For exposed bedrock geologic formations of interest to the public, the department of transportation may install appropriate signage, in compliance with applicable federal and state law, to identify the geological formation and may consult with the state geologist on the appropriateness of the signage.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 3029; R.S. 1931, § 52-105; C.S. 1945, § 48-106; W.S. 1957, § 24-18; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2019 ch. 64, § 1, effective November 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 3, effective November 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 64, § 1, effective November 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 186, § 3, effective November 1, 2019, in (b)(iii), substituted “under this subsection” for “under subsection (b) of this section.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Cross references. —

As to allocation of costs for construction of county roads, bridges and culverts, see §

24-2-110

.

Liability of director and employee in tort action. —

Fact that cloud of snow surrounding highway truck equipped with snow board made truck invisible to overtaking vehicles, the cloud being augmented by wind, is no reason for imposing liability on highway superintendent (now director) and employee, who were performing their statutory duties in cleaning the road. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

Evidence supported judgment denying plaintiff recovery for labor

furnished in constructing highway. — See Sims v. Southern Sur. Co., 38 Wyo. 165, 265 P. 450,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from design, construction, or failure to warn of narrow bridge, 2 ALR4th 635.

§ 24-1-119.
State highway fund created; income and expenditure.

There is created a fund known as the state highway fund, to the credit of which the state treasurer, who is designated as the state official to receive all amounts paid by the United States under the act of congress approved July 11, 1916, shall place all monies previously received for the fund, all money subsequently received from the United States, under cooperative agreements as authorized, all money derived from taxes levied for such purpose or appropriated for the fund, all monies received from the sale of state bonds for highway construction or improvement, all money received from the counties under cooperative agreements as hereinbefore authorized, and all other monies received from donations or bequests, which may be accepted by the commission on behalf of the state of Wyoming, or from any source designated by law for that purpose. All monies in the fund shall be available for the purpose of this act without further appropriation and no warrant shall be drawn on the fund excepting on a voucher approved by the director of the department of transportation or an assistant authorized by the director and approved by the transportation commission. It is provided that seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount of any bond issue subsequently issued by the state of Wyoming for the construction or improvement of state highways, after the payment of overhead expense, shall be apportioned to and spent in each county in the proportion which the assessed valuation of each county by the last general assessment bears to the total assessment of the state.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 3034; R.S. 1931, § 52-111; C.S. 1945, § 48-112; Laws 1949, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-19; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to contracts and agreements with United States government, see §

24-2-112

.

As to state highway bonds, see chapter 8 of this title.

As to deposit of gasoline tax into highway fund, see §

39-17-111

.

Editor's notes. —

The act of congress approved July 11, 1916, referred to in the first sentence, was temporary and is no longer carried in the United States Code.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” referred to in the second sentence, refer to Laws 1919, ch. 132, §§ 1 through 15, which appear herein as §§

24-1-118

through

24-1-120

,

24-2-101

,

24-2-105

through

24-2-110

and

24-2-112

.

Presentation of claims. —

Action on state highway construction contract cannot be maintained without complying with the law as to presentation of claims. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Presentation of claim to proper auditing officer is a condition precedent to the right to maintain an action thereon. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Suit against state highway commission is suit against state. —

Suit on road construction contract against state highway commission and its members executed by and in name of commission on behalf of the state was in effect suit against the state, and district court could have no jurisdiction on ground of diversity of citizenship in suit against state. State Highway Com. v. Utah Constr. Co., 278 U.S. 194, 49 S. Ct. 104, 73 L. Ed. 262, 1929 U.S. LEXIS 6 (U.S. 1929).

Pleadings. —

In action against state highway department on construction contract, petition was fatally defective where it did not show that claim was filed in time and filed with the proper officer. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

§ 24-1-120.
Administration of provisions; maximum overhead expenses.

It is hereby provided that all expenses of the maintenance of office, offices, salary, salaries, engineering, surveying, field supervision and other overhead expenses in connection with the administration of this act, shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the total amount expended each year under the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 13; C.S. 1920, § 3037; R.S. 1931, § 52-112; C.S. 1945, § 48-113; W.S. 1957, § 24-20.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” referred to twice in this section see “Meaning of ‘this act’ ” note to §

24-1-119

.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 14, repeals Laws 1917, ch. 76, but provides that such repeal should not affect contracts and agreements entered into under the 1917 act.

§ 24-1-121.
Highways subject to injury from cattle; designation; entry of order; notice to be posted.

The board of county commissioners of every county, wherein is situated any mountain road or highway or portion thereof, which would be liable to receive unusual injury and damage by driving over the same herds of cattle, horses or flocks of sheep, shall have the power, by order entered in the records of such board of commissioners, to designate so much of such road or highway as would be so liable to receive unusual injury and damage, as, not a highway for herds of horses, cattle or flocks of sheep, a notice of which designation shall be posted at convenient and conspicuous places along, and in the vicinity of the portion of such road or highway so designated, which notices shall likewise reasonably point out the lieu road or highway laid out as hereinafter provided.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 66, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2544; C.S. 1920, § 3016; R.S. 1931, § 52-235; C.S. 1945, § 48-335; W.S. 1957, § 24-21.

Public Easement. —

Declaratory judgment action filed by the County of Washakie was not the appropriate means to establish a prescriptive public easement because, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-1-101

, the legislature established a specific statutory procedure that required such claims to be brought initially before the board of county commissioners. Ten Broek v. County of Washakie, 2003 WY 164, 82 P.3d 269,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Person in charge of livestock on highway as “pedestrian” with respect to rights given, and duties imposed, by traffic rules and regulations, 30 ALR2d 866.

Liability of governmental entity for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision between vehicle and domestic animal at large in street or highway, 52 ALR4th 1200.

§ 24-1-122.
Highways subject to injury from cattle; designation of substitute highway.

In case of such designation it shall be the duty of the board of county commissioners of such county to provide in lieu of the portion of such highway, so designated, a highway for herds and flocks of cattle, horses and sheep which shall be reasonably safe and convenient for that purpose and shall be a reasonably convenient way of access to the same place that would otherwise be reached by the portions of the road or highway designated as not a highway for cattle, horses or sheep as aforesaid.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 66, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2545; C.S. 1920, § 3017; R.S. 1931, § 52-236; C.S. 1945, § 48-336; W.S. 1957, § 24-22.

Public Easement. —

Declaratory judgment action filed by the County of Washakie was not the appropriate means to establish a prescriptive public easement because, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-1-101

, the legislature established a specific statutory procedure that required such claims to be brought initially before the board of county commissioners. Ten Broek v. County of Washakie, 2003 WY 164, 82 P.3d 269,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 24-1-123.
Highways subject to injury from cattle; drover's liability.

Any person who shall drive any herd of horses, cattle or flock of sheep over any portion of any road or highway, so designated as not for horses, cattle or sheep as aforesaid, after such designation and the posting of notices as aforesaid, and after the provision of another reasonable highway for cattle, horses and sheep in lieu thereof as aforesaid, shall be liable to the county in which is situated such mountain road or highway, for any and all damages done thereto, by driving over the same, such flocks or herds of cattle, horses or sheep.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 66, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2546; C.S. 1920, § 3018; R.S. 1931, § 52-237; C.S. 1945, § 48-337; W.S. 1957, § 24-23.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of owner of animal for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision with domestic animal at large in street or highway, 29 ALR4th 431.

§ 24-1-124.
Livestock crossings; generally.

The department of transportation may provide suitable livestock crossings on all state highways, having an oil surface, in the state of Wyoming, at places where necessity and convenience require. Ranchmen, farmers and livestock raisers and producers may file with the board of county commissioners of their county a request for livestock crossings, and the various boards of county commissioners shall recommend from time to time to the department of transportation such crossings as they believe will best suit the necessities and convenience of ranchmen, farmers and livestock raisers and producers in their county.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 33, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-116; W.S. 1957, § 24-24; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to fences and cattle guards, see chapter 28 of title 11.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, livestock or fowl on highway, 55 ALR4th 822.

§ 24-1-125.
Livestock crossings; construction; length and width.

Such livestock crossings shall be constructed of such material that livestock will readily cross over the same and shall not be less than sixty (60) feet in length and the full width of the highway.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 33, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 48-117; W.S. 1957, § 24-25.

§ 24-1-126.
Livestock crossings; signs required.

Livestock crossings shall be indicated by conspicuous signs placed on each side of the highway.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 33, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 48-118; W.S. 1957, § 24-26.

§ 24-1-127.
Speed on city streets designated state highways.

When city streets are designated as state highways leading into, through, or out of a town or city, the department of transportation shall regulate the speed limits on such streets.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 24-27; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to applicability of this section, see §

24-7-103

.

§ 24-1-128.
Marking of highways.

All center markings and supplementary road shoulder markings on all highways within the boundaries of the state of Wyoming completed in asphalt, oil, concrete, or other hard surface shall be maintained with bright yellow lines, whether or not said markings be solid or broken yellow lines. The director of the department of transportation shall have the duty to enforce the provisions of this section and to provide for the effective maintenance of said yellow markings. The state transportation commission after a hearing may waive the application of this section to any highway or highway project if necessary to promote a safe and effective utilization of such highway or highway project. The governor and the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives of the state of Wyoming shall be notified in writing at least five (5) days before the hearing.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 30, § 1; ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-27.1; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

substituted “section” for “act” in the third sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 176, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Highways: governmental duty to provide curve warnings or markings, 57 ALR4th 342.

§ 24-1-129.
Marking of bypasses.

It is declared to be the policy of the state of Wyoming that where the Wyoming department of transportation has by law authorized a bypass to be built around any incorporated city or town, or an unincorporated community of the state of Wyoming, regardless of the population of such city, town or unincorporated community, the officially designated state highway and federal highway markings shall remain on the existing highway through the incorporated city or town or unincorporated community and the existing highway shall be retained and the new bypass highway shall carry the designation “bypass” or other similar markings.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 66, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-28; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-1-130.
Administration of highway safety provisions and programs.

The governor, in addition to other duties and responsibilities conferred upon him by the constitution and laws of this state is hereby empowered to contract and to do all other things necessary to secure the full benefits available to this state under the federal Highway Safety Act of 1966 [23 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.], and in so doing, to cooperate with federal and state agencies, private and public organizations, and with individuals, to effectuate the purposes of that enactment, and any and all subsequent amendments thereto. The governor shall be responsible for and is hereby empowered to administer through such appropriate agency of this state as he shall designate within thirty (30) days from the date hereof, the highway safety programs of this state and those of its political subdivisions, all in accordance with said act and federal rules and regulations in implementation thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 76, § 1; W.S. 1957 § 24-28.1.

§ 24-1-131.
Travel centers.

The transportation commission and the director of the department of transportation shall ensure that all buildings owned or controlled by the department of transportation and utilized as travel centers are directed and operated by one (1) or more agencies appointed by the transportation commission for the best interests of all Wyoming people. For purposes of this section an agency may be defined as a chamber of commerce, or any state or local governmental entity. If no agency is appointed, the commission shall direct and operate the travel centers.

The department of transportation, in consultation with the commission, shall establish facilities at one (1) or more travel centers to accept donations in support of wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. Funds collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the wildlife conservation account created under W.S. 31-2-231(b). In carrying out the requirements of this subsection, the department may enter into agreements with financial institutions or persons operating remote electronic terminals for the collection of donations.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 82,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-28.2; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2020 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (b).

§ 24-1-132.
Contracts for county, city and town bridge work; bids; exception.

The board of county commissioners of any county or governing body of any city or town shall cause to be prepared comprehensive plans and specifications for the construction of any bridge on any dedicated and maintained road in its jurisdiction.

As used in this section a bridge is a structure, including supports, erected over a depression or an obstruction, such as water, highway or railway, having a track or passageway for carrying traffic or other moving loads and having an opening measured along the center of the roadway of more than twenty (20) feet between undercopings of abutments, or spring lines of arches, or extreme ends of openings for multiple barrel box culverts. It may include multiple pipes, where the clear distance between openings is less than one-half (1/2) of the smaller contiguous opening.

When any bridge is to be constructed, which includes either new construction or reconstruction of major load carrying bridge components, upon any road in a county’s, city’s or town’s jurisdiction, the estimated cost of which shall exceed twenty–five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), the construction work shall be competitively bid and the bridge work constructed by contract. No contract shall be divided for the purpose of avoiding competitive bidding. The construction work may be described in the published call for bids by stating general requirements. Detailed specifications shall be available to prospective bidders at the county commissioner’s office or offices of the governing body of the city or town.

All bridges to be constructed shall be designed by a professional engineer who holds a valid license granted by the Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors.

The board of county commissioners of any county or governing body of any city or town shall cause notices of the contract to be let to be published for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation within the state and to take any other means available to achieve as wide a notice as possible, but in no case shall any letting of the contract be held within fifteen (15) days of the last published notice.

The board of county commissioners, or governing body of the city or town shall award any contract to the lowest responsible bidder. The county commissioners or governing body reserves the right to reject any bid and to waive irregularities and informalities in the bidding. No final payment upon any contract shall be made until the bridge is examined and approved by the professional engineer supervising the construction of the bridge and the payment is approved by the county commissioners or governing body of the city or town or their designees. Within ninety (90) days of the bridge being opened to traffic the board of county commissioners or governing body of the city or town shall notify and provide the design, plans, specifications and load rating for the bridge to the chief engineer of the department of transportation so that the department may comply with national bridge inspection standards.

Whenever an emergency arises requiring expenditure of funds for the repair or rebuilding of bridges or approaches to bridges the board of county commissioners or governing body of any city or town may enter into contract for any building or rebuilding of bridges or approaches without advertising for the letting of any contract. An emergency is an occasion requiring repair or rebuilding of a bridge or a portion of a bridge when, on short notice, the bridge has become unsafe or impassable due to events which are beyond the control of the county, city or town.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 71, § 1; 2018 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “or governing body of any city or town” following “any county” and substituted “maintained road in its jurisdiction” for “maintained county road”; in (c), substituted “any road in a county's, city's or town's jurisdiction, the estimated” for “any county road, the estimated” and added “or offices of the governing body of the city or town” at the end; rewrote (d); in (e), inserted “or governing body of any city or town” following “commissioners of any county”; rewrote (f); in (g), inserted “or governing body of any city or town” following “county commissioners” and added “city or town” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

Failure to advertise. —

County officers are not subject to impeachment for failing to advertise for bids for a bridge, as provided in this section. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from design, construction or failure to warn of narrow bridge, 2 ALR4th 635.

§ 24-1-133.
Posting notice of restrictions to public roads and adjacent lands; restrictions; penalties.

No person shall post a notice purporting to restrict access over a public road unless the restriction has been approved by the governing body having jurisdiction over the road.

For purposes of this section “public road” means any passageway to which there is a duly recorded instrument from the landowner or his predecessor in interest conveying to the public unrestricted legal right to use the passageway or to which a governing body has acquired unrestricted legal right for the public to use the passageway.

The governing body or its authorized representative having jurisdiction over the public road shall issue a written demand to any person who unlawfully posts a notice in violation of subsection (a) of this section directing that the notice be removed within three (3) days following receipt of the notice. The demand shall be delivered in person by a peace officer or mailed by both first class mail and certified mail return receipt requested to the person’s last known mailing address. Any person who knowingly posts an illegal notice or who fails to remove an illegal notice within three (3) days after receiving the demand from the governing body is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person cannot be personally served because he deliberately made himself unavailable for service, or refused to accept delivery of the demand by certified mail, then he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if he fails to remove the illegal notice within five (5) days after the demand was mailed to him by the governing body. Any person convicted of a misdemeanor under this section shall be punished by a fine up to six hundred dollars ($600.00) for each day the person fails to remove the illegal notice. For a second or subsequent offense, the penalty shall be a fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600.00) per day, and up to six (6) months in jail, or both.

It shall be a defense to any charge under this section, that severe weather or other circumstance not within control of the person charged prevented removal of the notice.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 13, § 1.

Quoted

in

Boykin v. Carbon County Bd. of Comm'rs, 2005 WY 158, 124 P.3d 677,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(2005).

§ 24-1-134.
Wyoming veterans memorial highway.

United States Highway 14-Alternate between the city boundaries of Cody, Wyoming and Powell, Wyoming shall be known as the “Wyoming Veterans Memorial Highway.”

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 89, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 89, §§ 2 and 3 provide:

“Section 2. The Wyoming department of transportation shall install appropriate signage, in compliance with all federal and state law and regulation, identifying United States Highway 14-Alternate between the city boundaries of Cody, Wyoming and Powell, Wyoming as the ‘Wyoming Veterans Memorial Highway.’

“Section 3. There is appropriated from the general fund to the Wyoming department of transportation five thousand dollars ($5,000.00). This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of creating and installing the signage required by section 2 of this act and shall not be expended until five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) has been received by the department of transportation from nonstate sources to assist in paying the costs of creating and installing the signage. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall not be included in the Wyoming department of transportation's 2013-2014 standard biennial budget request.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 89, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.